Utah statutes.
76-10-1305.   Exploiting prostitution.

(1) A person is guilty of exploiting prostitution if he:

(a)  procures an inmate for a house of prostitution or place in a house of prostitution for one who would be an inmate;

(b)  encourages, induces, or otherwise purposely causes another to become or remain a prostitute;

(c)  transports a person into or within this state with a purpose to promote that person's engaging in prostitution or procuring or paying for transportation with that purpose;

(d)  not being a child or legal dependent of a prostitute, shares the proceeds of prostitution with a prostitute pursuant to their understanding that he is to share therein; or

(e)  owns, controls, manages, supervises, or otherwise keeps, alone or in association with another, a house of prostitution or a prostitution business.

(2)  Exploiting prostitution is a felony of the third degree.



Amended by Chapter 1, 2000 General Session

